trunk/morphology/spellcheckUnificado_foma_new/normalizerSpellcheck.foma
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> [n|m]"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu (might otherwise be confused with -pa repetitive) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2  .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka ;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       #define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SIu" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];

	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  {si}"@SI" => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  {mi}"@MI" => Cons _  ];

	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];

       #define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;
	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2 .o. CHA3;



#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      source  as-1.foma
      source  as-2.foma
      source  as-3.foma
      source  as-4.foma
      source  as-5.foma
      source  as-6.foma
      source  as-7.foma
      define HonAff [ {lla}  "+Lim_Aff" ] : {lla} ;

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] ;


####################################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########

       source vroot.foma
       source vroot-es.foma
          define VRootES VRootESpre .o. SPanOrtho;
       source vroot-trans.foma
	  define VRootTrans VRootTranspre .o. QuechuaOrtho;

       define VROOTpre [VRootQ] .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define VROOT [VROOTpre|VRootES];

       source v-v-1.foma
       source v-v-2.foma
       source v-v-3.foma
       source v-v-4.foma
       source  v-v-5.foma
       source  v-v-6-norm.foma
       source v-v-7.foma

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

       source nroot.foma 
       source nroot-num.foma 
       source nroot.foma
       source nroot-indef.foma
       source nroot-cmp.foma
         define NRootCMP NRootCMPpre .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       source nroot-es.foma
         define NRootES NRootESpre .o. SpanOrtho;

       define NROOTpre [NRootQ|NRootNUM|NRootINDEF] .o. QuechuaOrtho ; 
       define NROOT [NROOTpre|NRootES];

       source n-n-1.foma
       source  n-n-2.foma
       source  n-n-3.foma
       #nominal transitive forms
       source  npers.foma 
       source n-n-4.foma
       source  n-n-5.foma
       source  n-n-6.foma
       source  n-n-7.foma
       define kamaDist [  {kama} "+Dist" ] : {kama};

      define NounSuffixes  [(N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho ;
     
######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################


       source n-v.foma
       source  v-n.foma 
       #mit diesen Suffixen nominalisierte Verben können nicht wieder verbalisiert werden
       source  v-n-final.foma
       source  v-n-transitive.foma
       define Relational [ {n} "+Rel" : {n} ];
       define VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS  VerbRulesUpper .o. [V=V=1^{0,3} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4) (HonAff)] .o. VerbRulesLower;

       #------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs:     #
       # VRoot + VtoN = NDeriv1 #
       # "taki-qti", "taki-y"   #
       #------------------------#
       define NDeriv1 [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv1final [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];
       define NDeriv1finalTrans [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans];

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized nouns:          #
       # NRoot + NtoV = VDeriv1     #
       # "wasi-n-cha-", "hatun-ya-" #
       # NtoV: -ykacha/kacha as     #
       # verbalizing suffix         #
       #----------------------------#
       define VDeriv1 [NROOT (Relational) (HonAff) NtoV];

       #--------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb Nr.2:         #
       # NRoot + NtoV + VtoN = NDeriv2  #
       # "wasi-n-cha-y", "hatun-ya-sqa" #
       #--------------------------------#
       define NDeriv2 [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv2final [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #--------------------------------#
       # verbalized noun Nr.2:          #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV = VDeriv1  #
       # "yaku-naya-q"                  #
       #--------------------------------#
       define VDeriv2 [NDeriv1 NtoV];

       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs Nr.3:             #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV +VtoN = NDeriv3 #
       # "yuya-y-cha-ku-y"                   #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv3 [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv3final [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

#define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv1final|NDeriv2|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3|NDeriv3final];
define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv2|NDeriv3];
define NDERIVFINAL [NDeriv1final|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3final];
define VDERIV [VDeriv1|VDeriv2];

       ###########################################
       #                                         #
       # verbs with incorporated nominal root    #
       #                                         #
       ###########################################
       define VRootInc [NRootQ VRootTrans];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb with incorporated nominal root:       #
       # "uywamichiy"                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define NRootInc [VRootInc  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal]];

       #--------------------#
       # nominal compounds  #
       #--------------------#
       
       define Compounds [[NRootQ|NDeriv1] NRootCMP NounSuffixes];


define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3) (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounConverbTrans watrans .o. sutrans .o. [[NDeriv1finalTrans] (HonAff) npers (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounNormal  [[NROOT|NDERIV|NRootInc|Compounds] NounSuffixes] ;
define Noun [NounConverb|NounNormal|NounConverbTrans];
define Verb  [[VROOT|VDERIV|VRootInc] VerbSuffixes];


#########################################################################
#########################################################################

       ############
       #          #
       # PRONOUNS #
       #          #
       ############

       #-------------------#
       # personal pronouns #
       #-------------------#
       source prnpers.foma
       define PrnPersInfl [PrnPers  (HonAff) (N=N=1) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)^{0,2}];

       #------------------------#
       # demonstrative pronouns #
       #------------------------#
       source prndem.foma
       define PrnDemInfl [PrnDem (HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (N=N=1) (N=N=2) (N=N=3) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} N=N=7^{0,2}];

       #------------------------#
       # interrogative pronouns #
       #------------------------#
       source prninterrog.foma
       define PrnInterrogInfl [PrnInterrog (N=N=1) (N=N=3) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)^{0,2}];

define Prn [PrnPersInfl|PrnDemInfl|PrnInterrogInfl] .o. QuechuaOrtho;

#########################################################################

       #############
       #           #
       # PARTICLES #
       #           #
       #############
       
       #---------------------------#
       # normal (nominal) and      #
       # verbalizable particles    #
       #---------------------------#
       source particle.foma
       source particle-verb.foma

       define ParticleBasic [verbalizableParticle (HonAff)(N=N=5)(HonAff)(N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)]; 

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized particles       #
       # particle + NtoV = PartVerb #
       # hina-cha-                  #
       #----------------------------#
       define ParticleVerb [verbalizableParticle NtoV] VerbSuffixes;

       #--------------------------------------#
       # nominalized PartVerb                 #
       # Particle-NtoV + VtoN = PartVerbNoun #
       # ama-cha-y                            #
       #--------------------------------------#
       define ParticleVerbNoun [verbalizableParticle NtoV VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal] (N=N=2) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)];
     

define Particles VerbRulesUpper .o. [[Particle|ParticleBasic|ParticleVerb|ParticleVerbNoun]] .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho;




#########################################################################

       
       ###################
       #                 #
       # ORDINAL NUMBERS #
       #                 #
       ###################
